Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 32
FEES

Sec.

§ 31-3201. Clerk of district court — Fees.

The clerk of the district court shall lawfully charge, demand and receive the following fees for services rendered by him in discharging the duties imposed upon him by law:

All fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be paid over to the county treasurer, at the same time and in the same manner as other fees.

In addition to all other fines, forfeitures and costs levied by the court, the clerk of the district court shall collect ten dollars ($10.00) as an administrative surcharge fee on each criminal case, including an infraction under section 18-8001 or 49-301, Idaho Code, a first-time infraction under section 23-604 or 23-949, Idaho Code, and five dollars ($5.00) on other infractions to be paid over to the county treasurer at the same time and in the same manner as other fees, for the support of the county justice fund, or the current expense fund if no county justice fund has been established, and shall collect ten dollars ($10.00) as an administrative surcharge fee on each civil case, including each appeal, to be paid over to the county treasurer for the support of the county court facilities fund, or to the district court fund if no county court facilities fund has been established.

Provided further, an additional handling fee of two dollars ($2.00) shall be imposed on each monthly installment of criminal or infraction fines, forfeitures, and other costs paid on a monthly basis.

Provided further, in addition to all other fines, forfeitures and costs levied by the court, the clerk of the district court shall collect ten dollars ($10.00) as a court technology fee on each criminal and infraction offense to be paid over to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fee to the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund.

For filing and docketing abstract or transcript of judgment from another court ............................... $2.00

For issuing execution upon an abstract or transcript of judgment and filing same on return ............................... $2.00

For recording execution issued upon abstract or transcript of judgment, per page ............................... $2.00

For taking affidavits, including jurat ............................... $1.00

For taking acknowledgments, including seal ............................... $1.00

For filing and indexing designation of agent of foreign corporation $2.00

For filing and indexing notarial statement ............................... $2.00

For making copy of any file or record, by the clerk, the clerk shall charge and receive, per page ............................... $1.00

For comparing and conforming a prepared copy of any file or record, the clerk shall charge and receive, per page ............................... $.50

For certifying the same an additional fee for certificate and seal ............................... $1.00

For all services not herein enumerated, and of him lawfully required, the clerk of the district court shall demand and receive such fees as are herein allowed for similar services.

§ 31-3201A. Court fees.

The clerk of the district court in addition to the fees and charges imposed by chapter 20, title 1, Idaho Code, and by section 31-3201, Idaho Code, and in addition to the fee levied by chapter 2, title 73, Idaho Code, shall charge, demand and receive the following fees for services rendered by him in discharging the duties imposed upon him by law:

Civil cases. A fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) for filing a civil case of any type in the district court, except for those cases to be assigned to the magistrate division of the district court for which the fee shall be one hundred twenty dollars ($120), with the following exceptions:

The fee for small claims shall be as provided in section 1-2303, Idaho Code;

No filing fee shall be charged in the following types of cases:

Cases brought under chapter 3, title 66, Idaho Code, for commitment of mentally ill persons;

Cases brought under the juvenile corrections act;

Cases brought under the child protective act;

Demands for bond before a personal representative is appointed in probate;

Petitions for sterilization;

Petitions for judicial consent to abortion;

Registration of trusts and renunciations;

Petitions for leave to compromise the disputed claim of a minor;

Petitions for a civil protection order or to enforce a foreign civil protection order pursuant to chapter 63, title 39, Idaho Code;

Objections to the appointment of a guardian filed by a minor or an incapacitated person;

Proceedings to suspend a license for nonpayment of child support pursuant to section 7-1405, Idaho Code;

Proceedings under the uniform post-conviction procedure act as provided in chapter 49, title 19, Idaho Code;

Filings of a custody decree from another state;

Filings of any answer after an initial appearance fee has been paid.

The filing fee shall be distributed as follows: twenty-three dollars ($23.00) of such filing fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county, with six dollars ($6.00) of such twenty-three dollars ($23.00) dedicated to provide for the suitable and adequate quarters of the magistrate’s division of the district court, including the facilities and equipment necessary to make the space provided functional for its intended use, and shall provide for the staff personnel, supplies and other expenses of the magistrate’s division; one dollar ($1.00) of such filing fee shall be paid to the peace officers standards and training fund established in section 19-5116, Idaho Code; one hundred thirty-five dollars ($135) of such filing fee, or in a case assigned to the magistrate division of the district court eighty dollars ($80.00) of such filing fee, shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund; ten dollars ($10.00) of such filing fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in accordance with subsection (15) of this section; and six dollars ($6.00) of such filing fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the senior magistrate judges fund.
(2) Felonies and misdemeanors. A fee of seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50) shall be paid, but not in advance, by each person found guilty of any felony or misdemeanor, except when the court orders such fee waived because the person is indigent and unable to pay such fee. Eleven dollars ($11.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county, with six dollars ($6.00) of such eleven dollars ($11.00) dedicated to provide for the suitable and adequate quarters of the magistrate’s division of the district court, including the facilities and equipment necessary to make the space provided functional for its intended use, and shall provide for the staff personnel, supplies and other expenses of the magistrate’s division; one dollar ($1.00) of such filing fee shall be paid to the peace officers standards and training fund established in section 19-5116, Idaho Code; and five dollars and fifty cents ($5.50) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in accordance with subsection (15) of this section.

(3) Infractions. A fee of sixteen dollars and fifty cents ($16.50) shall be paid, but not in advance, by each person found to have committed an infraction or any minor traffic, conservation or ordinance violation, and a fee of seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50) shall be paid, but not in advance, by each person found to have committed an infraction under section 18-8001 or 49-301, Idaho Code, or a first-time infraction under section 23-604 or 23-949, Idaho Code, and distributed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section; provided that the judge or magistrate may in his or her discretion consolidate separate nonmoving traffic offenses into one (1) offense for purposes of assessing such fee. Eleven dollars ($11.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county, with six dollars ($6.00) of such eleven dollars ($11.00) dedicated to provide for the suitable and adequate quarters of the magistrate’s division of the district court, including the facilities and equipment necessary to make the space provided functional for its intended use, and shall provide for the staff personnel, supplies and other expenses of the magistrate’s division; one dollar ($1.00) of such filing fee shall be paid to the peace officers standards and training fund established in section 19-5116, Idaho Code; and four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer, who shall pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in accordance with subsection (15) of this section.

(4) Initial appearance other than plaintiff. A fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be paid for any filing constituting the initial appearance by a party, except the plaintiff, in any civil action in the district court or in the magistrate division of the district court, except small claims. If two (2) or more parties are making their initial appearance in the same filing, then only one (1) filing fee shall be collected. Of such fee, four dollars ($4.00) shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county; eighty dollars ($80.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund; ten dollars ($10.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in accordance with subsection (15) of this section; and six dollars ($6.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the senior magistrate judges fund.

(5) Accountings. A fee of nine dollars ($9.00) shall be paid by the person or persons required to make an account pursuant to title 15, Idaho Code, at the time such account is filed. All of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county.
(6) Distribution of estate. A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be paid upon the filing of a petition of the executor or administrator or of any person interested in an estate for the distribution of such estate, six dollars ($6.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county; thirteen dollars ($13.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in accordance with subsection (15) of this section; and six dollars ($6.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the senior magistrate judges fund.

(7) Third-party claim. A fee of fourteen dollars ($14.00) shall be paid by a party filing a third-party claim as defined in the Idaho rules of civil procedure. Eight dollars ($8.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county; and six dollars ($6.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the senior magistrate judges fund.

(8) Cross-claims. A fee of fourteen dollars ($14.00) shall be paid by any party filing a cross-claim. Eight dollars ($8.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county; and six dollars ($6.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the senior magistrate judges fund.

(9) Change of venue. A fee of twenty-nine dollars ($29.00) shall be paid by a party initiating a change of venue. Such fee shall be paid to the clerk of the court of the county to which venue is changed. Nine dollars ($9.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county and twenty dollars ($20.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund.

(10) Reopening a case.

(a) A fee of eighty-five dollars ($85.00) shall be paid by any party appearing after judgment or applying to reopen a case. Nine dollars ($9.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county; six dollars ($6.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the senior magistrate judges fund; and seventy dollars ($70.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund.

(b) A fee of one hundred eight dollars ($108) shall be paid by a party applying to reopen a divorce action or modify a divorce decree, with seventeen dollars ($17.00) of the fee to be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county; fifteen dollars ($15.00) of such fee to be paid to the county treasurer who shall pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in accordance with subsection (15) of this section; six dollars ($6.00) of such fee to be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the senior magistrate judges fund; and seventy dollars ($70.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund.
(c) When the application to reopen a case consists only of a motion or other pleading to revive or renew a judgment, a fee of twenty-nine dollars ($29.00) shall be paid by the party filing the motion or pleading. Nine dollars ($9.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county and twenty dollars ($20.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund.

(11) Appeal to district court. A fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) shall be paid by a party taking an appeal from the magistrate division of the district court to the district court; nine dollars ($9.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county; six dollars ($6.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the senior magistrate judges fund; and twenty dollars ($20.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund. No additional fee shall be required if a new trial is granted.

(12) Appeal to supreme court. A fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) shall be paid by the party taking an appeal from the district court to the supreme court for comparing and certifying the transcript on appeal, if such certificate is required. Nine dollars ($9.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit in the district court fund of the county; six dollars ($6.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the senior magistrate judges fund; and twenty dollars ($20.00) of such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund.

(13) Fees not covered by this section, including fees to defray the costs of electronic access to court records other than the register of actions, shall be set by rule or administrative order of the supreme court.

(14) All fees required to be paid by this section or by rule or administrative order of the supreme court shall be collected by the clerk of the district court or by a person appointed by the clerk of the district court for this purpose. If it appears that there is a necessity for such fees to be collected by persons other than the clerk of the district court or a person designated by the clerk for such purpose, the supreme court by rule or administrative order may provide for the designation of persons authorized to receive such fees. Persons so designated shall account for such fees in the same manner required of the clerk of the district court and shall pay such fees to the clerk of the district court of the county in which such fees are collected.

(15) That portion of the filing fees required to be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit pursuant to subsections (1), (2), (3), (4), (6) and (10) of this section shall be apportioned eighty-six percent (86%) to the state general fund and fourteen percent (14%) to the peace officers standards and training fund authorized in section 19-5116, Idaho Code, within five (5) days after the end of the month in which such fees were remitted to the county treasurer. That portion of the filing fees required to be remitted to a city treasurer for deposit in the city’s general fund shall be remitted within five (5) days after the end of the month in which such fees were remitted to the county treasurer.

(16) Of the fees derived from the filing of any divorce action required to be transmitted to the state treasurer, the county treasurer shall retain five dollars ($5.00), which shall be separately identified and deposited in the district court fund of the county. Such moneys shall be used exclusively for the purpose of establishing a uniform system of qualifying and approving persons, agencies or organizations to conduct evaluations of persons convicted of domestic assault or battery as provided in section 18-918, Idaho Code, and the administration of section 18-918(7), Idaho Code, relating to the evaluation and counseling or other treatment of such persons, including the payment of the costs of evaluating and counseling or other treatment of an indigent defendant. No provision of chapter 52, title 39, Idaho Code, shall apply to the moneys provided for in this subsection.
(17) In consideration of the fees in this section, the clerk of the district court shall be required to perform all lawful service that may be required of him by any party thereto; provided, that he shall not prepare and furnish any certified copy of any file or record in an action except printed transcript on appeal, without additional compensation as provided by law.

§ 31-3201B. Peace officers standards and training — Fee.

The court shall charge a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for peace officers standards and training purposes to be paid by each person found guilty of any felony or misdemeanor, or found to have committed an infraction or any minor traffic, conservation or ordinance violation, except for cars unlawfully left or parked or when the court orders such fee waived because the person is indigent and unable to pay such fee; provided, however, that the judge or magistrate may in his discretion consolidate separate nonmoving traffic offenses into one (1) offense for purposes of assessing such fee. Such fees shall be in addition to all other fines and fees levied. Such fees shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the peace officers standards and training fund.

§ 31-3201C. Community service fee.

The court shall charge a fee of sixty cents (60¢) per hour of community service to be remitted to the state insurance fund for purposes of providing worker’s compensation insurance for persons performing community service; however, if a county is self-insured and provides worker’s compensation insurance for persons performing community service, then remittance to the state insurance fund is not required. This per hour fee shall be paid by each person found guilty of any felony or misdemeanor and community service is provided as part of the sanction or as a condition of a withheld judgment or probation. The court may waive such fee if it determines the person is indigent and unable to pay such fee. Such fees shall be in addition to all other fines and fees levied. Such fees shall be paid to the district court and deposited in the county treasury for payment to the state insurance fund.

§ 31-3201D. County misdemeanor probation supervision fee.

Any person under a supervised probation program for a misdemeanor offense shall be required to pay an amount not more than the maximum monthly felony probation or parole supervision fee set forth in section 20-225, Idaho Code, per month, or such lesser sum as determined by the administrative judge of the judicial district, as a misdemeanor probation supervision fee. Any failure to pay such fee shall constitute grounds for the revocation of probation by the court, but this shall not be the exclusive remedy for its collection. The court for good cause may exempt a person from the payment of all or any part of the foregoing fee.

Any fee paid under this section on or after July 1, 2008, and regardless of whether the underlying judgment of conviction, withheld judgment or order imposing probation was entered before or after that date, shall be paid to the clerk of the district court, who shall pay the first one dollar ($1.00) of each monthly payment to the state treasurer for deposit in the peace officers standards and training fund authorized in section 19-5116, Idaho Code, to help offset the costs to counties for the basic training, continuing education and certification of misdemeanor probation officers, whether those officers are employees of or by private sector contract with a county; the clerk of the district court shall deposit the remainder of each monthly payment into the county misdemeanor probation fund which is hereby created in each county, or, at the option of the board of county commissioners, deposited in the county justice fund to be used for the purposes described in this section. Moneys from this fee may be accumulated from year to year and shall be expended exclusively for county misdemeanor probation services and related purposes.

This section shall not restrict the court from ordering the payment of other costs and fees, including but not limited to electronic monitoring fees and other fees pursuant to section 19-2608, Idaho Code, that, by law, may be imposed on persons who have been found guilty of or have pled guilty to a criminal offense, including those who have been placed on probation or parole. Such additional costs and fees shall be paid to the clerk of the court if services are provided by the county or directly to the agency providing the service. If fees are paid to the clerk of the court, the clerk of the court shall pay such fees to the county treasurer and such fees shall be used exclusively to cover the costs for which the additional fees have been ordered.

§ 31-3201E. Drug court and mental health court fee — Drug court and mental health court fund.

Each person admitted into a drug court or mental health court shall pay a drug court and mental health court fee in an amount not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) per month or a lesser amount as set by the administrative district judge for participants in the drug court and mental health court. For good cause, the judge presiding over a drug court or mental health court may exempt a participant from paying all or a portion of the drug court and mental health court fee. The fee imposed under this section shall be paid to the clerk of the district court for deposit into the county drug court and mental health court fund which is hereby created in each county that has a drug court or mental health court. Moneys in this fund may be accumulated from year to year and shall be expended exclusively for expenses incurred in connection with the drug court or mental health court including, but not limited to, substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, drug testing, supervision and private counseling services utilized by the drug court or mental health court. Any failure to pay the drug court and mental health court fee may constitute grounds for termination from drug court or mental health court by the court, provided this shall not be the exclusive remedy for collection of the fee. If a participant is terminated from the drug court or mental health court prior to successful completion of the program and a judgment of conviction is entered against the defendant, any unpaid drug court and mental health court fee shall be ordered by the court in the judgment of conviction, provided the court may order such fee to be waived if the court determines that the person is indigent and unable to pay the fee. Such fee shall be in addition to all other fines and fees levied, and the payment of such fee may also be ordered as a term and condition of probation.

§ 31-3201F. Abandoned vehicle fee.

The court shall charge a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for reimbursement of expenses incurred in the disposition of an abandoned vehicle to be paid by each person found to have committed a traffic infraction according to the provisions of section 49-1802, Idaho Code. Such fees shall be in addition to all other fines and fees levied. Such fees shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within fifteen (15) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit to the abandoned vehicle trust account. Each fee shall be accompanied by a record of the conviction.

§ 31-3201G. Guardianship and conservatorship project fund.

In addition to any other filing and reporting fees applicable to guardianships and conservatorships, the court shall charge the following fees:

Fifty dollars ($50.00) for filing cases involving guardianships or conservatorships;

Forty-one dollars ($41.00) for reports required to be filed with the court by conservators; and

Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for reports required to be filed with the court by guardians.

The additional fees set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of this section shall be paid to the county treasurer, who shall pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the guardianship and conservatorship project fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the Idaho supreme court and shall consist of fees as provided in this section, any moneys recovered pursuant to section 15-5-314(2), Idaho Code, and any funds as may be appropriated by the legislature, grants, donations and moneys from other sources.

Moneys in the fund shall be expended exclusively for the development of a project which shall be designed to improve reporting and monitoring systems and processes for the protection of persons and their assets where a guardian or conservator has been appointed. Elements of the project may include, but are not limited to, the following:

The adoption of standards of practice for guardians;

A requirement that guardians be registered;

Consideration of an office of the public guardian in counties in which the project operates;

A review of the strengths of Idaho law regarding the treatment and care of developmentally disabled persons; and

If federal or grant funding is available, funding for adult protection services to seek guardians in cases for which volunteers cannot be enlisted.

The supreme court shall report annually to the senate judiciary and rules committee and the house judiciary, rules and administration committee regarding the progress of the project.

§ 31-3201H. Surcharge fee.

The court shall charge a surcharge fee to be paid by each defendant for each criminal offense or infraction committed on or after April 15, 2010, for which the defendant is found or pleads guilty. Such fee shall be in addition to all other fines and fees levied.

The amount of the surcharge fee shall be as follows:

For each felony, the fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100);

For each misdemeanor, and for each infraction under section 18-8001 or 49-301, Idaho Code, or each first-time infraction under section 23-604 or 23-949, Idaho Code, the fee shall be fifty dollars ($50.00); and

For each infraction, except each infraction under section 18-8001 or 49-301, Idaho Code, or each first-time infraction under section 23-604 or 23-949, Idaho Code, the fee shall be ten dollars ($10.00).

The fee shall be collected by the clerk of the district court and shall be paid to the county treasurer, who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer, who shall deposit eighty percent (80%) of such fees in the state general fund and twenty percent (20%) of such fees in the court technology fund created by section 1-1623, Idaho Code.

§ 31-3201I. Distribution of payments in criminal and infraction cases.

When ordered by the court to make one (1) of the following payments in a criminal or infraction case, a defendant shall make the payment to the clerk of the court in which the judgment was entered. The judgment shall be satisfied accordingly by entry in the electronic docket of the court, and the clerk of the court shall remit daily all such payments to the county auditor who shall, at least monthly, distribute the payments received as required by statute. The distributions shall first completely satisfy the amounts due in the following order before distribution of payments for any other amounts owed to the court, and any payment applied to a category below in which more than one (1) payment was ordered shall be distributed in proportion to the relative amounts of such ordered payments:

Fees for each felony, misdemeanor, and infraction paid pursuant to section 31-3201A(2) and (3), Idaho Code;

Fines or reimbursements paid for the crime victims compensation account pursuant to section 72-1025, Idaho Code;

Misdemeanor probation supervision fees, including court-ordered costs and fees, paid pursuant to section 31-3201D, Idaho Code;

Pretrial release supervision fees paid pursuant to section 31-3201J, Idaho Code;

County drug and mental health fund fees paid pursuant to section 31-3201E, Idaho Code;

Fines paid for the peace officer and detention officer temporary disability fund pursuant to section 72-1105, Idaho Code;

Restitution to victims of crime paid and distributed pursuant to section 19-5304, Idaho Code, if paid through the clerk of the court;

Fines entered on behalf of victims in cases of crimes of violence paid pursuant to section 19-5307, Idaho Code;

Community service fees paid pursuant to section 31-3201C, Idaho Code;

Victim notification fund fees paid pursuant to section 31-3204, Idaho Code;

Court technology fees paid pursuant to section 31-3201(5), Idaho Code;

Surcharge fees paid pursuant to section 31-3201H, Idaho Code;

Peace officers standards and training fees paid pursuant to section 31-3201B, Idaho Code;

Domestic violence court fees paid pursuant to section 32-1410, Idaho Code;

Criminal and infraction fines;

Reimbursement for public defender costs paid pursuant to section 19-854(7), Idaho Code;

Costs of prosecution ordered as a condition of probation and paid pursuant to section 19-2601, Idaho Code, and Idaho criminal rule 33(d)(2);

Domestic violence fines for the domestic violence project account paid pursuant to section 39-6312, Idaho Code;
(19) Drug hotline fees paid pursuant to section 37-2735A, Idaho Code;

(20) Additional fish and game fines for the search and rescue fund paid pursuant to section 36-1405, Idaho Code;

(21) County administrative surcharge fees paid pursuant to section 31-3201(3), Idaho Code;

(22) Motor vehicle violation surcharge fees and ignition interlock and electronic monitoring fees paid pursuant to sections 18-8008 and 18-8010, Idaho Code;

(23) Costs for toxicology testing paid pursuant to section 37-2732C(g), Idaho Code;

(24) Costs incurred by law enforcement agencies in investigating controlled substance violations pursuant to chapter 27, title 37, Idaho Code, violations of the racketeering act pursuant to section 18-7804, Idaho Code, or money laundering and illegal investment provisions of section 18-8201, Idaho Code, paid pursuant to section 37-2732(k), Idaho Code;

(25) Restitution for the repair or replacement of simulated wildlife paid pursuant to section 36-1101(b)(8), Idaho Code;

(26) Abandoned vehicle fees paid pursuant to section 31-3201F, Idaho Code; and

(27) Any other amounts paid pursuant to any statutory section not referenced in this section.

§ 31-3201J. Pretrial supervision fee.

Any person under a supervised pretrial release program may be required to pay an amount not more than the maximum monthly misdemeanor probation supervision fee set forth in section 31-3201D, Idaho Code, per month, or such lesser sum as determined by the administrative judge of the judicial district, as a pretrial release supervision fee to cover the actual costs of supervising the defendant while in the supervised pretrial release program.

A defendant shall not be required to pay the pretrial supervision fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section until after a judgment of conviction or withheld judgment.

The pretrial supervision fee shall be paid to the clerk of the court, who shall pay such fees to the county treasurer. Such fees shall be used exclusively to cover the costs of the pretrial services provided by the pretrial services agency that has been designated to provide such services.

The court may also order the defendant to pay additional fees to cover the actual costs of electronic monitoring, alcohol testing, or drug testing if such monitoring or testing is a condition of the defendant’s release. Such additional fees may be paid to the clerk of the court or directly to the provider of the service. If fees are paid to the clerk of the court, the clerk of the court shall pay such fees to the county treasurer and such fees shall be used exclusively to cover the costs for which the additional fees have been ordered.

Based on a finding of indigence or other good cause, the court may exempt the defendant from the payment of all or any part of the fees authorized by this section, and no defendant shall be denied release or denied participation in a supervised pretrial release program because of an inability to pay the fees authorized by this section. Any unpaid pretrial services fee shall be considered a debt owed to the court and may be collected in the manner provided by law for the collection of such debts.

§ 31-3202. Clerk of district court — Exceptions to fee schedule.

In any action instituted in the name of any county auditor, as trustee for the county for the foreclosure of any tax lien, no state stenographer’s fee must be charged or received by the clerk of the district court.